Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,123
Plan of reorganization;
contents.

After one or more public hearings have
been held, the state committee may approve a plan or plans of reorganization
pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act. Such plan shall contain:

(1) A description of the proposed boundaries of the reorganized
districts and a designation of the class for each district;

(2) A summary of the reasons for each proposed change, realignment,
or adjustment of the boundaries which shall include, but not be limited to,
an explanation of how the plan complies with any statutory requirements for
learning community organization and an assurance that the plan does not increase
the geographic size of any school district that has more than twenty-five
thousand students;

(3) A summary of the terms on which reorganization is to
be made between the reorganized districts. Such terms shall include a provision
for initial school board districts or wards within the proposed district,
which proposed initial school board districts or wards shall be determined
by the state committee taking into consideration population and valuation, a determination of the number of members
to be appointed to the initial school board for Class II and III school districts, and
a determination of the terms of the board members first appointed to membership
on the board of the newly reorganized district;

(4) A statement of the findings with respect to the location
of schools, the utilization of existing buildings, the construction of new
buildings, and the transportation requirements under the proposed plan of
reorganization;

(5) A map showing the boundaries of established school districts
and the boundaries proposed under any plan or plans of reorganization; and

(6) Such other matters as the state committee determines
proper to be included.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 34;

Laws 2014, LB946, § 38.